Tennessee, session 114, SB2384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1016, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (e):
(e)
(1) An LEA or public charter school shall, no later than thirty (30) days
before any instruction on firearm safety is provided by the LEA or public charter
school pursuant to this section, notify the parent or legal guardian of each
student enrolled in the LEA or public charter school that:
(A) The LEA or public charter school will provide instruction on
firearm safety to students in accordance with this section; and
(B) The parent or legal guardian may opt their student out of
receiving the instruction pursuant to this subsection (e).
(2) The parent or legal guardian of a student, or the student if the student
is at least eighteen (18) years of age, may opt the student out of receiving any
instruction on firearm safety pursuant to this section by providing written notice to
the principal of the school at which the student is enrolled.
(3) A student who is opted out of receiving instruction on firearm safety
pursuant to this subsection (e) is excused from receiving the instruction and must
not be penalized for grading purposes by the LEA or public charter school.
SB2384
012000
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-176(c)(9), is amended by
deleting the language "A school counselor or school psychologist" and substituting instead the
language "A school counselor, school psychologist, or school social worker".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012000